Florida, session 2026, SB836.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (13) is added to section 627.944, 11 Florida Statutes, to read: 12 627.944âRisk retention groups not certificated in this 13 state.âRisk retention groups certificated or licensed in states 14 other than this state and seeking to do business as a risk 15 retention group in this state must observe and abide by the laws 16 of this state as follows: 17 (13)âAUTHORIZATION.âA risk retention group registered to do 18 business in this state pursuant to this section is an insurance 19 company authorized to do business in this state. 20 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.